Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.090

Receiver—Removal for cause—Successive appointments.

The receiver may be removed for cause as provided in RCW 35.07.200 and a successor to the receiver may be appointed as provided in RCW 35.07.210.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.090.]